Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 1. Administration of Child Welfare.
§ 43-15-19.
Adoption resource exchange registry.

The State Department of Public Welfare shall maintain a Mississippi Adoption Resource Exchange registry, which shall contain a total listing of all children freed for adoption as well as a listing of all persons who wish to adopt children and who are approved by a licensed adoption agency in the State of Mississippi. Said registry shall be distributed to all county welfare directors and licensed adoption agencies within the state and shall be updated at least quarterly. The State Department of Public Welfare shall establish regulations for listing descriptive characteristics while protecting the privacy of the children’s names. Listed names shall be removed when adoption placement plans are made for a child or when a person withdraws an application for adoption.

Adoptive parents shall be given the option of having their names placed in the registry. They shall be required to give written authority to the county welfare department to place their names in the registry and said authorization shall be forwarded to the state department of public welfare, division of social services, for approval.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 443, § 1(6)(7), eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1978).

§ 43-15-21.
Penalty for releasing confidential information.

Anyone violating or releasing information of a confidential nature without the approval of the court with jurisdiction or the State Department of Public Welfare upon being found guilty shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment of six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 443, § 1(8), eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1978).

§ 43-15-23.
“Placing Out”; defined.

As used in this section the term “placing out” means to arrange for the free care of a child in a family, other than that of the child’s parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, sister, uncle or aunt or legal guardian, for the purpose of adoption or for the purpose of providing care.

No person, agency, association, corporation, institution, society or other organization, except a child placement agency licensed by the Department of Public Welfare under Section 43-15-5, shall request, receive or accept any compensation or thing of value, directly or indirectly, for placing out of a child.

No person shall pay or give any compensation or thing of value, directly or indirectly, for placing out of a child to any person, agency, association, corporation, institution, society or other organization except a child placement agency licensed by the Department of Public Welfare.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to (a) prevent the payment of salaries or other compensation by a child placement agency licensed by the Department of Public Welfare to the officers or employees thereof; (b) prevent the payment of legal fees, which have been approved by the chancery court, to an attorney for services performed in regard to adoption proceedings; (c) prevent the payment of reasonable and actual medical fees or hospital charges for services rendered in connection with the birth or medical treatment of such child to the physician or hospital which rendered the services; or (d) prevent the receipt of such payments by such attorney, physician or hospital.

Any person, agency, association, corporation, institution, society or other organization violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of illegal placement of children and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment not more than five (5) years, or both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 456, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 43-15-25.
Elected officials as foster parents; payments on behalf of foster child.

An elected official shall not be precluded from serving as a foster parent under this act [Chapter 516, Laws of 1998], and any payments on behalf of or for the benefit of a foster child shall not be considered a contract of interest or compensation or financial income to the elected official in violation of Section 109 of the Mississippi Constitution or any related statutes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1998.